Utah statutes.
35A-4-207.   Unemployment.
(1) (a)  An individual is "unemployed" in any week during which he performs no
services and with respect to which no wages are payable to him, or in any week
of less than full-time work if the wages payable to him with respect to the
week are less than his weekly benefit amount.
(b)  The department shall prescribe rules applicable to unemployed individuals
making distinctions in the procedure as to total unemployment, part-total
unemployment, partial unemployment of individuals attached to their regular
jobs, and other forms of short-time work, as the department considers
necessary.
(2)  The department may by rule prescribe in the case of individuals working
on a regular attachment basis the existence of unemployment for periods longer
than a week if:
(a)  it is a period of less than full-time work;
(b)  insofar as possible the loss of wages required as a condition of being
considered unemployed in those periods shall be such as to allow comparable
benefits, for comparable loss in wages, to those individuals working less than
full-time in each week as would be payable on a weekly claim period basis to
those individuals working full-time and not at all in alternate weeks.
(3)  Unemployment shall in no case be measured on a basis of longer than a
four-week period.
